Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1049.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 43.70 RCW to read as follows:(1) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the department shall establish a stipend program to defray the out-of-pocket expenses incurred by registered nurses completing the training necessary to become adult/adolescent or pediatric sexual assault nurse examiners.(2) The total amount of the stipend for any individual nurse may not exceed $2,500.(3) For purposes of this section, "out-of-pocket expenses" include:(a) Fees, tuition, educational materials, or other charges imposed by the entity providing training;(b) Reasonable travel expenses, including air travel, rental car costs, mileage on a personal vehicle, lodging, and meals; and(c) Any other expenses deemed appropriate by the department.(4) The department may adopt any rules necessary to implement this section.--- END ---